District of Columbia statutes.
1-1306

Records, papers, and instruments to be kept and preserved by Surveyor.

The Surveyor shall keep his office in a room designated by the Mayor for the purpose, and shall not be engaged in the transaction of any business appertaining to any other office or appointment which may be held by him, and shall in his said office preserve and keep all such maps, charts, surveys, books, records, and papers relating to the District of Columbia, or to any of the avenues, streets, alleys, public spaces, squares, lots, and buildings thereon, or any of them, as shall for the purpose of being deposited in his office come into his hands or possession; and shall, in books provided or to be provided for that purpose, keep a true record of every survey, certificate, or account which shall be made, issued, or prepared by him, and also shall preserve and keep in good order and repair the instruments in his said office belonging to the District.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1427, ch. 854, § 1599

Cross References

Designation of real property for assessment and taxation, records, see §§ 47-701 and 47-705.
Designation of real property for assessment and taxation, transcript of conveyances, see § 47-707.
Highway plans, maps and records, see §§ 9-103.02 and 9-101.13.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-906.
1973 Ed., § 1-606.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.